Utah statutes.
48-1-3.   "Partnership" defined.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a partnership is an association
of two or more persons to carry on as coowners a business for profit.
(b)  "Partnership" when used in a statute of the state, includes a limited
liability partnership registered under Section 48-1-42, unless the context
requires otherwise.
(2)  An association formed under any other statute of this state, or any
statute adopted by authority other than the authority of this state, is not a
partnership under this chapter, unless such association would have been a
partnership in this state prior to the adoption of this chapter.
(3)  This chapter shall apply to limited partnerships except in so far as the
statutes relating to such partnerships are inconsistent herewith.
